Washington statutes.
RCW 37.12.120

Quileute, Chehalis, Swinomish, Skokomish, Muckleshoot, Tulalip, and Colville Indian reservations—Retrocession of criminal jurisdiction—Proclamation by governor.

Whenever the governor receives from the confederated tribes of the Colville reservation or the Quileute, Chehalis, Swinomish, Skokomish, Muckleshoot, or Tulalip tribe a resolution expressing their desire for the retrocession by the state of all or any measure of the criminal jurisdiction acquired by the state pursuant to RCW 37.12.021 over lands of that tribe's reservation, the governor may, within ninety days, issue a proclamation retroceding to the United States the criminal jurisdiction previously acquired by the state over such reservation. However, the state of Washington shall retain jurisdiction as provided in RCW 37.12.010. The proclamation of retrocession shall not become effective until it is accepted by an officer of the United States government in accordance with 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1323 (82 Stat. 78, 79) and in accordance with procedures established by the United States for acceptance of such retrocession of jurisdiction. The Colville tribes and the Quileute, Chehalis, Swinomish, Skokomish, Muckleshoot, and Tulalip tribes shall not exercise criminal or civil jurisdiction over non-Indians.

[ 1995 c 202 s 3; 1995 c 177 s 3; 1994 c 12 s 3; 1988 c 108 s 3; 1986 c 267 s 4.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1995 c 177 s 3 and by 1995 c 202 s 3, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Severability—1986 c 267: See note following RCW 37.12.100.